Louisiana, session 2026, HB338.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Pursuant to R.S. 49:193, the agencies transferred to or placed within the
office of the governor pursuant to R.S. 36:4.1, to wit: the Louisiana State Board of
Cosmetology, the Office of Financial Institutions, the Louisiana State Racing Commission,
the Louisiana Cemetery Board, the State Board of Certified Public Accountants of
Louisiana, the State Board of Architectural Examiners, the Louisiana Real Estate
Commission, the Louisiana State Board of Home Inspectors, the State Licensing Board for
Contractors, the Board of Examiners of Certified Shorthand Reporters, the Louisiana
Auctioneers Licensing Board, the State Board of Examiners of Interior Designers, the
Louisiana Real Estate Appraisers Board, the Louisiana State Athletic Commission, the
Louisiana Motor Vehicle Commission, the Louisiana Used Motor Vehicle Commission, and
the Louisiana State Polygraph Board shall be re-created effective June 30, 2026, and all
statutory authority therefor is continued in accordance with the provisions of Part XII of
Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Section 2. All statutory authority for the existence of the aforementioned agencies
and the statutory entities made a part of them as re-created by Section 1 of this Act shall
cease as of July 1, 2033, pursuant to R.S. 49:191. However, the aforementioned agencies
may be re-created prior to such date in accordance with the provisions of Part XII of Chapter
1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 338 ENROLLED
Section 3. The provisions of R.S. 49:193 are hereby superseded to the extent that
those provisions are in conflict with the provisions of this Act.
Section 4. R.S. 49:191(4) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§191. Termination of legislative authority for existence of statutory entities; phase-
out period for statutory entities; table of dates
Notwithstanding any termination dates set by any previous Act of the
legislature, the statutory entities set forth in this Section shall begin to terminate their
operations on July first of each of the following years, and all legislative authority
for the existence of any statutory entity, as defined in R.S. 49:190, shall cease as of
July first of the following year, which shall be the termination date:
* * *
(4) July 1, 2025 2032:
(a) Those entities transferred to or placed within the office of the governor
pursuant to R.S. 36:4.1.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 49:191(1)(n) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 6. This Act shall become effective on June 30, 2026; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
June 30, 2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.